Hawaii statutes.
§674-21 Attorney's fees and costs. In
any action brought under this part, the court may, as it deems just, award to a
prevailing claimant and enter as part of its order or judgment, a reasonable
sum for costs and expenses incurred, including reasonable attorney's fees. [L
1991, c 323, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 351, §14]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next